North Dakota, session 69, HB1293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 37-18 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Burial medallion program.
1. As used in this section, "medallion" means a small, durable marker attached to an existing
headstone or grave marker to indicate a veteran's status.
2. The department of veterans' affairs shall establish and administer a program to provide a
medallion for a national guard or national guard reserve member, not buried in the state
veterans' cemetery, who does not qualify for another medallion from the state or federal
department of veterans affairs.

H. B. NO. 1293 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1293.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State